District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the "Industrial Revenue Bond Forward Commitment Program Amendment
Act of 2025".
Sec. 2. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 47-340.01 is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase "limited partnership," and
inserting the phrase "limited partnership, limited liability company," in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase "Assistant City Administrator
for Economic Development, Deputy Mayor for Financial Management" and inserting the phrase
"Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development" in its place.
(3) Paragraph (10) is amended by striking the phrase "and industrial and
commercial development authorized pursuant to this subchapter" and inserting the phrase


“industrial and commercial development, and any other area authorized under section 490 of the
Home Rule Act and pursuant to this subchapter” in its place
(b) Section 47-340.02 is amended by striking the phrase “multiple separate series in an
aggregate principal amount not to exceed $850,000,000” and inserting the phrase “multiple
separate series” in its place.
(c) Section 47-340.03 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the number “30” and inserting the
number “10” in its place.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended by:
(A) Striking the phrase “30 days” and inserting the phrase “10 days” in its
place; and
(B) Striking the phrase “30-day” and inserting the phrase “10-day” in its
place.
(d) Section 47-340.07(a) is repealed.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December


24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.


GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN SCHWALB
ATTORNEY GENERAL
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Megan D. Browder
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: June 12, 2024
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of the “Industrial Revenue Bond Forward Commitment
Program Amendment Act of 2024”
(AE-24-361)
___________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify
that this Office has reviewed the Industrial Revenue Bond Forward
Commitment Program Amendment Act of 2024” and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any
questions in this regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 724-5524.
_________________________________
Megan D. Browder